Utah statutes.
59-2-1350.   Land irregularly or erroneously assessed not to be sold.
(1)  If the county auditor discovers before the tax sale that because of an
irregular or erroneous assessment any property should not be sold, the auditor
may not sell the property, and the county legislative body shall cause the tax
records to reflect the correction in the next succeeding year, on the basis of
the value and rates of the year for which it was erroneously assessed, to be
collected as other taxes are collected.
(2)  If the county auditor, subject to approval by the county legislative
body, issues a written finding that it may be in the best interest of the
public to withdraw a property from the tax sale, the county auditor may
withdraw the property from the sale.
